Washington statutes.
RCW 19.375.040

Exclusions.

(1) Nothing in this chapter applies in any manner to a financial institution or an affiliate of a financial institution that is subject to Title V of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley act of 1999 and the rules promulgated thereunder.

(2) Nothing in this chapter applies to activities subject to Title V of the federal health insurance privacy and portability act of 1996 and the rules promulgated thereunder.

(3) Nothing in this chapter expands or limits the authority of a law enforcement officer acting within the scope of his or her authority including, but not limited to, the authority of a state law enforcement officer in executing lawful searches and seizures.

[ 2017 c 299 s 5.]